src/fst/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON 3_MERIDID_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ SM53. short V in Inf
ODD_INFINITES_MERIDID ;
+Ind+Prs: ODD_PRS ;
+Ind+Prt: ODD_PRT ;
+Ind+Prt: ODD_DU_ERRORTH ;
+Cond+Prs: ODD_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: ODD_POT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:^CLEN^RLEN%> # ; ! meerrid
+Imprt: ODD_IMPRT_REST ;

+Der4+Der/InchL:i^CLEN^RLEN%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; ! huolâtškuođij
+Der1+Der/st:ist 4_ADELISTID ; !sačalistiđ
:^CLEN DER_MAS ; ! meerridmâš
+Der1+Der/Caus:itt 4_ADELISTID ;
+Der2+Der/alla:â%>i6ll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; !ráđádâllâđ (rä^RVđ^RCid)
+Der2+Der/adda:â%>i6dd 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; !ráigánâddâđ
+Der3+Der/Pass: C_MERIDUD ;


LEXICON ODD_INFINITES_MERIDID !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:%>iđ K ;
+PrsPrc:%> IJJE_PRSPRC ;
+PrfPrc:%>âm K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^CLEN^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>âm K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>iččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>ižžii K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:^CLEN^RLEN K ; !!tt added
+VAbess:^CLEN^RLEN VABESS ;
+Actio+Nom:%>em NOMACT ;
+Actio+Nom+Err/Orth:%>im NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:^CLEN^RLEN%>mân K ;
+Actio+Ess:^CLEN^RLEN%>min K ;
+Actio+Loc:^CLEN^RLEN%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:^CLEN^RLEN%>máin K ;
+Ger:^CLEN^RLEN%>dijn K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:^CLEN^RLEN%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:^CLEN^RLEN%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:^CLEN^RLEN%>dijnis K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct: FLAG_3KEPIDEM ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:%> IJJE ;
!+Der3+Der/Pass: C_PASS_LONG ; ! C_MERIDUD instead


LEXICON 3_PUTESTID
+V: 3_PUTESTID_V ;
LEXICON 3_PUTESTID_IV
+V+IV: 3_PUTESTID_V ;
LEXICON 3_PUTESTID_TV
+V+TV: 3_PUTESTID_V ;

LEXICON 3_PUTESTID_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ SM53. short V in Inf

 ODD_VINFINITES_PUTESTID ; ! Diacriticn to shorten V
+Ind+Prs: ODD_PRS_PUTESTID ;
+Ind+Prt: ODD_DU_ERRORTH ;
+Ind+Prt: ODD_PRT ;
+Cond+Prs: ODD_COND ;
+Imprt+Sg2:^CLEN^SLEN%> # ;
+Imprt: ODD_IMPRT_REST ;
+Pot+Prs: ODD_POT ;

+Der4+Der/InchL:i6^CLEN^SLEN%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; ! putteestškuođij
+Der1+Der/st:ist 4_ADELISTID ;
:^CLEN^SLEN DER_MAS ; ! putteestmâš
+Der1+Der/Caus:itt 4_ADELISTID ;
+Der2+Der/alla:â%>i6ll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; !
+Der2+Der/adda:â%>i6dd 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; !ráigánâddâđ
+Der3+Der/Pass: C_MERIDUD ;

LEXICON ODD_VINFINITES_PUTESTID
+Inf:%>iđ K ;
+PrsPrc:%> IJJE_PRSPRC ;
+PrfPrc:%>âm K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^CLEN^SLEN K ; ! jiem putteest
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>âm K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>iččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>ižžii K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
+VAbess:^CLEN^SLEN VABESS ; ! putteesthánnáá
+Actio+Nom:%>em NOMACT ;
+Actio+Nom+Err/Orth:%>im NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:^CLEN^SLEN%>mân K ; ! Sofia: putteestmân
+Actio+Ess:^CLEN^SLEN%>min K ; ! Sofia: putteestmin
+Actio+Loc:^CLEN^SLEN%>mist K ; ! Sofia: putteestmist
+Actio+Com:^CLEN^SLEN%>máin K ; !
+Ger:^CLEN^SLEN%>dijn K ; ! MLO: putteestdijn; Sofia: id.
+Ger+PxSg1:%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:%>dijnis K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct: FLAG_3KEPIDEM ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:%> IJJE ;

LEXICON ODD_PRS_PUTESTID  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:%>âm K ;
+Sg2:%>ah K ;
+Sg3:^CLEN^SLEN K ; ! putteest
+Du1:%>een K ;
+Du2:^CLEN^SLEN%>vettee K ; ! putteestvettee
+Du3:%>ává   K ;
+Pl1:%>ep K ;
+Pl2:^CLEN^SLEN%>vetteđ K ; ! putteestvetteđ
+Pl3:%>eh K ;


LEXICON 3_COKKIITTID
+V: 3_COKKIITTID_V ;
LEXICON 3_COKKIITTID_IV
+V+IV: 3_COKKIITTID_V ;
LEXICON 3_COKKIITTID_TV
+V+TV: 3_COKKIITTID_V ;

LEXICON 3_COKKIITTID_V  !!= * __@CODE@__ SM52, long V in Inf
ODD_VINFINITES_COKKIITTID ;
+Ind+Prs: ODD_PRS_COKKIITTID ;
+Ind+Prt: ODD_PRT ;
+Ind+Prt: ODD_DU_ERRORTH ;
+Cond+Prs: ODD_COND ;
+Pot+Prs: ODD_POT ;
+Imprt+Sg2:^SVSH K ; ! cokkit
+Imprt: ODD_IMPRT_REST ;

+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^SVSH K ;
+Der4+Der/InchL:i6^WG^SVSH%>škyett4 4SYLL_KYETTID_DER ; ! huolâtškuođij
+Der1+Der/st:ist 4_ADELISTID ;
:^SVSH DER_MAS ; ! cokkitmâš
+Der1+Der/Caus:itt 4_ADELISTID ;
+Der2+Der/alla:â%>i6ll 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; !
+Der2+Der/adda:â%>i6dd 4_KAVNATTATTAD ; !ráigánâddâđ
+Der3+Der/Pass: C_MERIDUD ;

LEXICON ODD_VINFINITES_COKKIITTID  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Inf:%>iđ K ;
+PrsPrc:%> IJJE_PRSPRC ;
+PrfPrc:%>âm K ;
+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>âm K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>iččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>ižžii K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg: K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:%> IJJE ;
+VAbess:^SVSH VABESS ;
+Actio+Nom:%>em NOMACT ;
+Actio+Nom+Err/Orth:%>im NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:^SVSH%>mân K ;
+Actio+Loc:^SVSH%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:^SVSH%>máin K ;
+Actio+Ess:^SVSH%>min K ;
+Ger:^SVSH%>dijn K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:^SVSH%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:^SVSH%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:^SVSH%>dijnis K ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct: FLAG_3KEPIDEM ;

LEXICON ODD_PRS_COKKIITTID  !!= ** __@CODE@__
+Sg1:%>âm K ;
+Sg2:%>ah K ;
+Sg3:^SVSH    K ;
+Du1:%>een K ;
+Du2:^SVSH%>vettee K ;
+Du3:%>ává   K ;
+Pl1:%>ep K ;
+Pl2:^SVSH%>vetteđ K ;
+Pl3:%>eh K ;



!! !Common lexicons inflecting odd-syllabic verbs
! -----------------------------------------------



LEXICON ODD_INFINITES   !!= * __@CODE@__
+Inf:%>iđ K ;
+PrsPrc:%> IJJE_PRSPRC ;
+PrfPrc:%>âm K ;
+Imprt+ConNeg:^CLEN^RLEN K ; ! tt added
!+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^RLEN K ;
!+Imprt+ConNeg:^RLEN K ; ! tt added

+Ind+Prt+ConNeg:%>âm K ;
+Cond+Prs+ConNeg:%>iččii K ;
+Pot+Prs+ConNeg:%>ižžii K ;

+VAbess:^RLEN VABESS ;

+Actio+Nom:%>em NOMACT ;
+Actio+Ill:^RLEN%>mân K ;
+Actio+Ess:^RLEN%>min K ;
+Actio+Loc:^RLEN%>mist K ;
+Actio+Com:^RLEN%>máin K ;
+Ger:^RLEN%>dijn K ;
+Ger+PxSg1:^RLEN%>dijnân K ;
+Ger+PxSg2:^RLEN%>dijnâd K ;
+Ger+PxSg3:^RLEN%>dijnis K ;
+Der2+Der/NomAg:%> IJJE ;
+Der4+Der/NomAct: FLAG_3KEPIDEM ;

LEXICON ODD_PRS_CONNEG    !!= * __@CODE@__
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:^RLEN K ;
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^CLEN^RLEN K ;

LEXICON ODD_PRS_CONNEG_rlen    !!= * __@CODE@__
+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^RLEN K ;

!LEXICON ODD_PRS_CONNEG_wg    !!= * __@CODE@__
!+Ind+Prs+ConNeg:^WG^RLEN K ;             ! ceegât
!+Ind+Prs+ConNeg+Use/NG:^WG^RLEN^CLEN K ; ! ceeggât



LEXICON ODD_PRS   !!= * __@CODE@__
+Sg1:%>âm K ;
+Sg2:%>ah K ;
+Sg3:^CLEN^RLEN    K ;
+Du1:%>een K ;
+Du2:^CLEN^RLEN%>vettee K ;
+Du3:%>ává   K ;
+Pl1:%>ep K ;
+Pl2:^CLEN^RLEN%>vetteđ K ;
+Pl3:%>eh K ;

LEXICON ODD_PRT  !!= * __@CODE@__
+Sg1:%>im K ;
+Sg2:%>ih K ;
+Sg3:%>ij    K ;
+Du1:%>áim K ;
+Du2:%>áid K ;
+Du3:%>áin  K ;
+Pl1:%>ijm K ;
+Pl2:%>ijd K ;
+Pl3:%>ii K ;

LEXICON ODD_COND   !!= * __@CODE@__
+Sg1:%>iččim K ;
+Sg2:%>iččih K ;
+Sg3:%>ičij K ;
+Du1:%>iččijm K ;
+Du1+Err/Orth:%>iččiijm K ;
+Du2:%>iččijd K ;
+Du2+Err/Orth:%>iččiijd K ;
+Du3:%>iččijn K ;
+Du3+Err/Orth:%>iččiijn K ;
+Pl1:%>iččijm K ;
+Pl2:%>iččijd K ;
+Pl3:%>iččii K ;

LEXICON ODD_POT   !!= * __@CODE@__
+Sg1:%>ižžeem K ;
+Sg2:%>ižžeeh K ;
+Sg3:%>iš K ;
+Du1:%>ižžeen K ;
+Du2:%>išvettee K ;
+Du3:%>ižává K ;
+Pl1:%>ižžep K ;
+Pl2:%>išvetteđ K ;
+Pl3:%>ižeh K ;


LEXICON ODD_IMPRT   !!= * __@CODE@__
!+Sg2+Use/NG:^RLEN K ; !čuolâl wrong
+Sg2:^CLEN^RLEN K ;    !čuollâl ok
ODD_IMPRT_REST ;

LEXICON ODD_IMPRT_REST   !!= * __@CODE@__
+Sg3:%>us K ;
+Du1:%>oon K ;
+Du2:%>ee K ;
+Du3:%>us K ;
+Pl1:%>op K ;
+Pl2:%>iđ K ;
+Pl3:%>us K ;



LEXICON ODD_DU_ERRORTH  !!= * __@CODE@__
+Du1+Err/Orth:%>ááim K ; ! these separate, perhaps skip
+Du2+Err/Orth:%>ááid K ; ! only á ?
+Du3+Err/Orth:%>ááin  K ;



!! !!Derivational extentions to 3-syllabic verbs

LEXICON 3_DERIVED_LOW  !!= * __@CODE@__ lexicon to be determined
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:^RLEN^SLEN    K ; ! no ^VHIGH
3_DERIVED_REST ; ! the rest

LEXICON 3_DERIVED  !!= * __@CODE@__ lexicon
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:^VHIGH^RLEN^SLEN    K ; ! ^VHIGH
3_DERIVED_REST ; ! the rest

LEXICON 3_DERIVED_SLEN  !!= * __@CODE@__ lexicon
+V+Ind+Prs+Sg3:^SLEN    K ; ! ^VHIGH
3_DERIVED_REST ; ! the rest
