src/fst/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON Verbs
almaskiđ:alma^SVsk 3_PUTESTID_IV ; ! aˊlmask ¢almaask
avediđ:av^RCe^SVd 3_PUTESTID_IV ; !¢ avedâm avveed
cicestiđ:cic^RCe^SVst 3_PUTESTID_TV ;
cimostiđ:cim^RCo^SVst 3_PUTESTID_TV ; !¢ cimmoost
njunádiđ:njun^RCá^SVd 3_PUTESTID_TV ; ! njunnáád
ciŋkkáástiđ:ciŋkkáást 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! q
ciŋkkááttiđ:ciŋkkáátt 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! q
cokkiittiđ:cokkiitt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! !YAML
hacciittiđ:hacciitt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ;
cuikkááttiđ:cui4kkáátt 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! q
cuávgááttiđ:cuávgáátt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! cuávˊgáátt
fiskodiđ:fisko^SVd 3_PUTESTID_IV ; ! fiˊskod
happiittiđ:happiitt 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! q
havvuustiđ:havvuust 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
heiviittiđ:hei4viitt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ;
hitodiđ:hit^RCo^SVd 3_PUTESTID_TV ; !¢ hittood
huhkádiđ:huhká^SVd 3_PUTESTID_IV ; ! huˊhkád
huksiittiđ:huksiitt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
hurgettiđ:hurge^SVtt 3_PUTESTID ; ! huˊrge^SVtt
iällááttiđ:iälláátt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! - SM52 iällát ! Length change in stem: Long V in Inf (before C#) !YAML
išediđ:iš^RCe^SVd 3_PUTESTID_TV ; !¢ išediđ iššeed
jalhettiđ:jalhe^SVtt 3_PUTESTID ; !  jaˊlhe^SVtt
jorgettiđ:jorge^SVtt 3_PUTESTID_IV ; !  joˊrge^SVtt
jottááttiđ:jottáátt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
karodiđ:kar^RCo^SVd 3_PUTESTID_TV ; !¢ karrood
karttuuttiđ:karttuutt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
kasodiđ:kas^RCo^SVd 3_PUTESTID ; !¢ kassood
kihestiđ:kih^RCe^SVst 3_PUTESTID_TV ;
kimediđ:kim^RCe^SVd 3_PUTESTID ; !¢ kimedâm kimmeed
kiäddááttiđ:kiäddáátt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! kiädˊdáátt
kiškettiđ:kiške^SVtt 3_PUTESTID_TV ; !  kiˊške^SVtt
kolmuustiđ:kolmuust 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
komániđ:kom^RCá^SVn 3_PUTESTID_IV ;
komášiđ:kom^RCá^SVš 3_PUTESTID_TV ;
kordálgiđ:kordá^SVlg 3_PUTESTID ; ! koˊrdálg
kuhediđ:ku^RVh^RCe^SVd 3_PUTESTID_TV ; ! kuhedâm kuhheed ! kuhed
kulluuttiđ:kulluutt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! - SM52 kullut ! Length change in stem: Long V in Inf (before C#) !YAML
kušodiđ:kuš^RCo^SVd 3_PUTESTID ; ! kuššood
laiguuttiđ:lai4guutt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! q
laiđiistiđ:lai4điist 3_COKKIITTID ;
lappuustiđ:lappuust 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! q
lasaniđ:las^RCa^SVn 3_PUTESTID_IV ;
kosettiđ:ko^RVs^RCe^SVtt 3_PUTESTID_TV "valvottaa" ; !
latkiittiđ:latkiitt 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! q
leškiistiđ:leškiist 3_COKKIITTID_TV ;
livvuuttiđ:livvuutt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
lopediđ:lop^RCe^SVd 3_PUTESTID_TV ; ! lopedâm loppeed ! loped
luccááttiđ:luccáátt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! q
luŋŋiittiđ:luŋŋiitt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
maŋaniđ:maŋ^RCa^SVn 3_PUTESTID_IV ;
murdettiđ:murde^SVtt 3_PUTESTID ; ! muˊrde^SVtt
muštottiđ:mušto^SVtt 3_PUTESTID_TV ; ! muˊštott
máttááttiđ:máttáátt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! q
nistettiđ:niste^SVtt 3_PUTESTID_TV ; !  niˊste^SVtt
njadostiđ:njad^RCo^SVst 3_PUTESTID_IV ; !¢ njaddoost
njibžettiđ:njibže^SVtt 3_PUTESTID ; !  njiˊbže^SVtt
njiäpčááttiđ:njiäpčáátt 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! njiäpˊčáátt
njuškottiđ:njuško^SVtt 3_PUTESTID ; ! njuˊškott
njápčááttiđ:njápčáátt 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! q
nurvostiđ:nurvo^SVst 3_PUTESTID ; ! nuˊrvost
ooviittiđ:ooviitt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
oskeldiđ:oske^SVld 3_PUTESTID_TV ; ! oˊskeld
pajaniđ:paj^RCa^SVn 3_PUTESTID_IV ; ! paijaan; pls note j>ij in lengthening
pasottiđ:pas^RCo^SVtt 3_PUTESTID_TV ; ! passoot sg 3; ij paasoot neg prs
passuuttiđ:passuutt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
piegguuttiđ:piegguutt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! piegˊguutt
pisániđ:pis^RCá^SVn 3_PUTESTID_IV ;
piäškááttiđ:piäškáátt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! piäšˊkáátt
pompestiđ:pompe^SVst 3_PUTESTID ; ! poˊmpest
putestiđ:put^RCe^SVst 3_PUTESTID_TV ; ! q
putásmiđ:pu^RVt^RCá^SVsm 3_PUTESTID_IV ; ! q!YAML
puállááttiđ:puálláátt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! puálˊláátt
puánjostiđ:puánjo^SVst 3_PUTESTID ; ! puáˊnjost
pálkkááttiđ:pálkkáátt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! q
pánttááttiđ:pánttáátt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! q
riäpčááttiđ:riäpčáátt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! riäpˊčáátt
ruámččááttiđ:ruámččáátt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! ruámˊččáátt
ruškodiđ:ruško^SVd 3_PUTESTID ; ! ruˊškod
skircettiđ:skirc^RCe^SVtt 3_PUTESTID ; ! skiˊrc^RCe^SVtt
skuávkkááttiđ:skuávkkáátt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! skuávˊkkáátt
skužestiđ:skuž^RCe^SVst 3_PUTESTID_IV ;
sovestiđ:sov^RCe^SVst 3_PUTESTID_TV ;
steikkiistiđ:steikkiist 3_COKKIITTID_TV ;
sundediđ:sunde^SVd 3_PUTESTID ; ! sundedâm sunded ! suˊnded
suorgiittiđ:suorgiitt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! suorˊgiitt
sutettiđ:sut^RCe^SVtt 3_PUTESTID_IV ; ! q
tavaniđ:tav^RCa^SVn 3_PUTESTID ;
ucášiđ:uc^RCá^SVš 3_PUTESTID ;
uládiđ:ul^RCá^SVd 3_PUTESTID_IV ; !¢ ulláád
viekkiittiđ:viekkiitt 3_COKKIITTID ; ! viekˊkiitt
vinjádiđ:vinj^RCá^SVd 3_PUTESTID_IV ; !¢ vinnjáád
volliittiđ:volliitt 3_COKKIITTID_TV ; ! q
vuážáskiđ:vuáž^RCá^SVsk 3_PUTESTID_IV ; ! vuáˊžásk
časkestiđ:časke^SVst 3_PUTESTID ; ! čaˊskest
čielgiistiđ:čielgiist 3_COKKIITTID_TV ;
čiŋŋuustiđ:čiŋŋuust 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! q
čokániđ:čok^RCá^SVn 3_PUTESTID_IV ; !čokkáán ! q
čolliistiđ:čolliist 3_COKKIITTID ;
čurgiistiđ:čurgiist 3_COKKIITTID ;
čuákkááttiđ:čuákkáátt 3_COKKIITTID_IV ; ! čuákˊkáátt
šaldottiđ:šaldo^SVtt 3_PUTESTID ; ! šaldoot sg 3
